el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Κινητικότητα & προσβασιμότητα > Αξεσουάρ εξοπλισμού προσβασιμότητας: Αξεσουάρ scooter κινητικότητας; Αξεσουάρ προσθετικών και ορθωτικών; Αξεσουάρ αναπηρικού αμαξιδίου
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Mobilnost in dostopnost > Dodatki za opremo za osebe s posebnimi potrebami: Dodatki za mobilne skuterje; Dodatki za proteze in ortoze; Dodatki za invalidske vozičke
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > การเคลื่อนไหวและการเข้าถึง > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือสำหรับการเข้าถึงพิเศษ: อุปกรณ์เสริมสกู๊ตเตอร์เคลื่อนย้าย; อุปกรณ์เสริมขาเทียมและเฝือก; อุปกรณ์เสริมรถเข็นผู้ป่วย
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 無障礙行動力 > 無障礙設施配件: 行動代步車配件; 假肢及矯形配件; 輪椅配件
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Rörlighet och tillgänglighet > Tillbehör till tillgänglighetsutrustning: Elscootertillbehör; Protes- och ortostillbehör; Rullstolstillbehör
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Мобилност и помощни средства > Аксесоари за помощни средства: Аксесоари за мобилен скутер; Протезни и ортопедични аксесоари; Аксесоари за инвалидна количка
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Mobilitet og tilgjengelighet > Tilbehør til tilgjengelighetsutstyr: Mobilitetsscooter-tilbehør; Protese- og ortosetilbehør; Rullestoltilbehør
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Liikkuminen ja esteettömyys > Liikkumisen apuvälineiden lisätarvikkeet: Liikkumisapuskootteritarvike; Proteesi- ja ortoosilisävaruste; Pyörätuolitarvike
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Mobilitás és hozzáférhetőség > Kisegítőberendezés-kiegészítők: Mobilitási robogó kiegészítők; Protézis- és ortéziskiegészítők; Kerekesszék-kiegészítők
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Mobilite ve Kolay Erişim > Kolay Erişim Ekipmanı Aksesuarları: Mobilite Scooter Aksesuarları; Protez ve Ortez Aksesuarları; Tekerlekli Sandalye Aksesuarları
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Artykuły dla osób mających trudności z poruszaniem się > Akcesoria do sprzętu ułatwiającego poruszanie się: Akcesoria do skuterów inwalidzkich; Akcesoria protetyczne i ortotyczne; Akcesoria do wózków inwalidzkich
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Senioren- & Behindertenbedarf > Zubehör für Behindertengerechte Möbel & Vorrichtungen: Mobilitätsscooter-Zubehör; Prothesen- & Orthesen-Zubehör; Rollstuhl-Zubehör
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 无障碍与移动辅助用品 > 辅助设备配件: 电动代步车配件; 假肢和矫形器配件; 轮椅配件
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Mobilitate și accesibilitate > Accesorii pentru echipamente de accesibilitate: Accesorii pentru scutere de mobilitate; Accesorii pentru proteze și orteze; Accesorii pentru scaune cu rotile
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Bevægelighed og mobilitet > Tilbehør til mobilitetsudstyr: Mobilitetsscootertilbehør; Protese- og ortosetilbehør; Kørestolstilbehør
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Обеспечения мобильности людей > Аксессуары для оборудования для маломобильных людей: Аксессуары для скутеров для передвижения; Аксессуары для протезов и ортезов; Аксессуары для инвалидных колясок
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Mobilita a dostupnosť > Príslušenstvo k vybaveniu pre bezbariérový prístup: Príslušenstvo pre invalidné skútre; Príslušenstvo pre protézy a ortézy; Príslušenstvo pre invalidné vozíky
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Mobilidade e acessibilidade > Acessórios de equipamento de acessibilidade: Acessórios para scooters de mobilidade; Acessórios para próteses e ortóteses; Acessórios para cadeiras de rodas
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Mobilité et accessibilité > Accessoires pour matériel d’accessibilité: Accessoires pour scooters de mobilité; Accessoires pour prothèses et orthèses; Accessoires pour fauteuils roulants
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Sản phẩm hỗ trợ khả năng di chuyển và tiếp cận > Phụ kiện thiết bị hỗ trợ khả năng tiếp cận: Phụ kiện xe scooter trợ di chuyển; Phụ kiện chi giả và chỉnh hình; Phụ kiện xe lăn
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Mobiliteit en toegankelijkheid > Accessoires voor toegankelijkheidsapparatuur: Mobiliteitsscooter accessoires; Prothetische en orthotische accessoires; Rolstoel accessoires
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Movilidad y accesibilidad > Accesorios para equipos de accesibilidad: Accesorios de scooter de movilidad; Accesorios de prótesis y órtesis; Accesorios de silla de ruedas
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Mobilumas ir pritaikymas neįgaliesiems > Pritaikymo neįgaliesiems įrangos priedai: Judėjimo skuterio priedai; Protezų ir ortozių priedai; Neįgaliojo vežimėlio priedai
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Mobility & Accessibility > Accessibility Equipment Accessories: Mobility Scooter Accessories; Prosthetic & Orthotic Accessories; Wheelchair Accessories
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Mobilidade e acessibilidade > Acessórios para equipamento de acessibilidade: Acessórios para scooter de mobilidade; Acessórios protéticos e ortóticos; Acessórios para cadeira de rodas
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Mobilnost i pristupačnost > Pribor za opremu za pristupačnost: Dodatna oprema za električne skutere; Dodatna oprema za proteze i ortotiku; Dodatna oprema za invalidska kolica
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Omezená pohyblivost a bezbariérový přístup > Pomůcky pro invalidy – příslušenství: Příslušenství k elektrickým invalidním skútrům; Příslušenství k protézám a ortézám; Příslušenství k invalidním vozíkům
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Mobilità e accessibilità > Accessori ausili accessibilità: Accessori dello scooter per mobilità; Accessori ortopedici e protesici; Accessori per sedie a rotelle
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 移動補助具・生活補助具 > 生活補助具関連用品: 電動スクーター用アクセサリー; 義肢・装具用アクセサリー; 車椅子用アクセサリー
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 이동/사용 편의 > 사용 편의 장비 부대용품: 이동 스쿠터 액세서리; 의족 및 보조기 액세서리; 휠체어 액세서리